Hawaii statutes.
§571-34 Criminal history record checks.
The judiciary shall develop standards to ensure the reputable and responsible
character of employees of detention facilities defined in this chapter which
shall include but not be limited to criminal history record checks. All
employees and applicants for employment at facilities established under section
571-33 shall be subject to criminal history record checks and shall provide
consent to the judiciary to obtain other criminal history record information
for verification. The judiciary shall obtain criminal history record
information through the Hawaii criminal justice data center on all employees
and applicants. The judiciary may terminate an employee or deny employment to
an applicant who was convicted of a crime and if the judiciary finds that the
criminal history record indicates that the employee or applicant poses a risk
to the health, safety, security, or well-being of youths under detention. [L
1985, c 209, §7; am L 2003, c 95, §15(2)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next